Utah statutes.
70A-5-109.   Fraud and forgery.
(1)  If a presentation is made that appears on its face strictly to comply
with the terms and conditions of the letter of credit, but a required document
is forged or materially fraudulent, or honor of the presentation would
facilitate a material fraud by the beneficiary on the issuer or applicant:
(a)  the issuer shall honor the presentation, if honor is demanded by:
(i)  a nominated person who has given value in good faith and without notice
of forgery or material fraud;
(ii)  a confirmer who has honored its confirmation in good faith;
(iii)  a holder in due course of a draft drawn under the letter of credit
which was taken after acceptance by the issuer or nominated person; or
(iv)  an assignee of the issuer's or nominated person's deferred obligation
that was taken for value and without notice of forgery or material fraud after
the obligation was incurred by the issuer or nominated person; and
(b)  the issuer, acting in good faith, may honor or dishonor the presentation
in any other case.
(2)  If an applicant claims that a required document is forged or materially
fraudulent or that honor of the presentation would facilitate a material fraud
by the beneficiary on the issuer or applicant, a court of competent
jurisdiction may temporarily or permanently enjoin the issuer from honoring a
presentation or grant similar relief against the issuer or other persons only
if the court finds that:
(a)  the relief is not prohibited under the law applicable to an accepted
draft or deferred obligation incurred by the issuer;
(b)  a beneficiary, issuer, or nominated person who may be adversely affected
is adequately protected against loss that it may suffer because the relief is
granted;
(c)  all of the conditions to entitle a person to the relief under the law of
this state have been met; and
(d)  on the basis of the information submitted to the court, the applicant is
more likely than not to succeed under its claim of forgery or material fraud
and the person demanding honor does not qualify for protection under
Subsection (1)(a).
